Wyoming, session 2025, SF0167.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 7-19-106(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlii), 7-19-201(a) by creating a new paragraph
(xxxvi), 33-10-106 and 33-10-110 by creating new
subsections (h) and (j) are amended to read:
7-19-106. Access to, and dissemination of,
information.
(a) Criminal history record information shall be
disseminated by criminal justice agencies in this state,
whether directly or through any intermediary, only to:
(xlii) The board of chiropractic examiners for
purposes of obtaining background information on persons
applying for initial licensure under title 33, chapter 10
of the Wyoming statutes, and for purposes of investigation
of complaints and disciplinary action against licensees of
the board.
7-19-201. State or national criminal history record
information.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0167
ENROLLED ACT NO. 86, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) The following persons shall be required to submit
to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national
criminal history record information:
(xxxvi) All persons applying for initial
licensure to the board of chiropractic examiners under
title 33, chapter 10 of the Wyoming statutes, and any
licensee of the board of chiropractic examiners upon
written request from the board as part of an ongoing
investigation of or disciplinary action against the
licensee.
33-10-106. Application for license; educational
requirements; fees; criminal history record background
check.
(a) Any person wishing to practice chiropractic in
this state shall make application to the board of
chiropractic examiners, upon such form and in such manner
as may be prescribed and directed by the board. Each
applicant shall be a graduate of a recognized school of
chiropractic having an accredited program which is
professional in content and which meets the academic and
training standards established by the board. There shall be
paid by each applicant a license fee in an amount
established by the board pursuant to W.S. 33-1-201 which
fee shall accompany the application.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, the board shall request
criminal history background information as authorized under
W.S. 7-19-106(a)(xlii) for all initial applicants for
licensure under this chapter.
(c) Each initial applicant for licensure under this
chapter shall provide the board fingerprints and other
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0167
ENROLLED ACT NO. 86, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
information necessary for a criminal history record
background check as provided under W.S. 7-19-201.
33-10-110. Prohibited acts; refusal, revocation or
suspension of license; appeals.
(h) The board may request criminal history background
information as authorized under W.S. 7-19-106(a)(xlii) for
purposes of investigation of complaints and disciplinary
action against licensees of the board.
(j) Upon written request from the board, a licensee
shall provide the board fingerprints and other information
necessary for a criminal history record background check as
provided under W.S. 7-19-201 as part of an ongoing
investigation of or disciplinary action against the
licensee.
Section 2. This act shall apply to all initial
applicants for licensure and any licensees subject to
investigation or disciplinary action by the board of
chiropractic examiners on and after July 1, 2025.
Section 3. The board of chiropractic examiners shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this act not later than July 1, 2025.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0167
ENROLLED ACT NO. 86, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4